District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.163

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed under this subchapter, no person shall assume or use the title or designation “real estate broker”, the abbreviation “R.E.B.”, or any other title designation, words, letters, abbreviations, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the person is licensed as a real estate broker in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.163.